Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 8. Dissolution and Winding Up.

§79-14-801.
Events causing dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved, and its activities and affairs must be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following:

An event or circumstance that the partnership agreement states causes dissolution;

The affirmative vote or consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective;

After the dissociation of a person as a general partner:

The passage of ninety (90) consecutive days after the dissociation of the partnership’s last limited partner, unless before the end of the period the partnership admits at least one (1) limited partner;

The passage of ninety (90) consecutive days during which the partnership has only one (1) partner, unless before the end of the period:

On application by a partner, the entry by the chancery court for the county in which the office of the limited partnership is located of an order dissolving the partnership on the grounds that:

The signing and filing of a statement of administrative dissolution by the Secretary of State under Section 79-14-811.

If the partnership has at least one (1) remaining general partner, the affirmative vote or consent to dissolve the partnership not later than ninety (90) days after the dissociation by partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective; or

If the partnership does not have a remaining general partner, the passage of ninety (90) days after the dissociation, unless before the end of the period:

Consent to continue the activities and affairs of the partnership and admit at least one (1) general partner is given by limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective; and

At least one (1) person is admitted as a general partner in accordance with the consent;

The partnership admits at least one (1) person as a partner;

If the previously sole remaining partner is only a general partner, the partnership admits the person as a limited partner; and

If the previously sole remaining partner is only a limited partner, the partnership admits a person as a general partner;

The conduct of all or substantially all the partnership’s activities and affairs is unlawful; or

It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership’s activities and affairs in conformity with the certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement; or

If an event occurs that imposes a deadline on a limited partnership under subsection (a) and before the partnership has met the requirements of the deadline, another event occurs that imposes a different deadline on the partnership under subsection (a):

The occurrence of the second event does not affect the deadline caused by the first event; and

The partnership’s meeting of the requirements of the first deadline does not extend the second deadline.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-801 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 801, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to nonjudicial dissolution. Present similar provisions are found in current
§ 79-14-801, above.

Requirement that amendment to certificate of limited partnership be filed to reflect continuation of business under this section after event of withdrawal of general partner, see § 79-14-202.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 910 et seq.

68 C.J.S., Partnership §§ 610-612.

§79-14-802.
Winding up.

A dissolved limited partnership shall wind up its activities and affairs and, except as otherwise provided in Section 79-14-803, the partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.

In winding up its activities and affairs, the limited partnership:

Shall discharge the partnership’s debts, obligations, and other liabilities, settle and close the partnership’s activities and affairs, and marshal and distribute the assets of the partnership;

Shall file a statement of dissolution of the limited partnership with the Secretary of State; and

May:

Preserve the partnership activities, affairs, and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

Transfer the partnership’s property;

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration; and

Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

If a dissolved limited partnership does not have a general partner, a person to wind up the dissolved partnership’s activities and affairs may be appointed by the affirmative vote or consent of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection:

Has the powers of a general partner under Section 79-14-804 but is not liable for the debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the partnership solely by reason of having or exercising those powers or otherwise acting to wind up the dissolved partnership’s activities and affairs; and

Shall deliver promptly to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to the partnership’s certificate of limited partnership stating:

That the partnership does not have a general partner;

The name and street and mailing addresses of the person; and

That the person has been appointed pursuant to this subsection to wind up the partnership.

On the application of a partner, the chancery court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved limited partnership, including the appointment of a person to wind up the partnership’s activities and affairs, if:

The partnership does not have a general partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to subsection (c); or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-802 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 802, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to judicial dissolution. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-801.

Chancery courts generally, see §§ 9-5-1 et seq.

Provision that limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs must be wound up upon entry of decree of judicial dissolution under this section, see § 79-14-801.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution. 20 A.L.R.4th 122.

19 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Partnership, Form 342.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 613.

§79-14-803.
Rescinding dissolution.

A limited partnership may rescind its dissolution, unless the chancery court has entered an order under Section 79-14-801(a) (6) dissolving the partnership or the Secretary of State has dissolved the partnership under Section 79-14-811.

Rescinding dissolution under this section requires:

The affirmative vote or consent of each partner; and

If the limited partnership has delivered to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the partnership is dissolved and:

The rights of a third party arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or had notice of the rescission may not be adversely affected.

The amendment has not become effective, delivery to the Secretary of State for filing of a statement of withdrawal under Section 79-14-208 applicable to the amendment; or

The amendment has become effective, delivery to the Secretary of State for filing of an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of the dissolution stating that dissolution has been rescinded under this section.

If a limited partnership rescinds its dissolution:

The partnership resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if dissolution had never occurred;

Subject to paragraph (3), any liability incurred by the partnership after the dissolution and before the rescission is effective is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-803 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 803, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the winding up of a limited partnership. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-802.

Chancery courts generally, see §§ 9-5-1 et seq.

Requirement that certificates of dissolution and cancellation be signed by general or limited partners conducting winding up of affairs under this section, see § 79-14-204.

Provision that limited partner who winds up limited partnership does not thereby participate in control of business for purposes of provisions as to liability to third parties, see § 79-14-303.

Distribution of assets, see § 79-14-804.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership § 913.

68 C.J.S., Partnership §§ 610-612.

§79-14-804.
Power to bind partnership after dissolution.

A limited partnership is bound by a general partner’s act after dissolution which:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership’s activities and affairs; or

Would have bound the partnership under Section 79-14-402 before dissolution if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

A person dissociated as a general partner binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two (2) years has passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not know or have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner; and

The act:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership’s activities and affairs; or

Would have bound the partnership under Section 79-14-402 before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-804 [Laws,
1987, ch. 488, § 804, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the distribution of a dissolved limited partnership’s assets. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-810.

Partner’s entitlement to remedies available to creditor of limited partnership, when he becomes entitled to distribution, subject to this section and § 79-14-607, see § 79-14-606.

§79-14-805.
Liability after dissolution of general partner and person dissociated as general partner.

If a general partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under Section 79-14-804(a) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership’s activities and affairs, the general partner is liable:

To the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

If another general partner or a person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to that other general partner or person for any damage caused to that other general partner or person arising from the liability.

If a person dissociated as a general partner causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under Section 79-14-804(b), the person is liable:

To the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the obligation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-806.
Known claims against dissolved limited partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a dissolved limited partnership may give notice of a known claim under subsection (b), which has the effect provided in subsection (c).

A dissolved limited partnership may in a record notify its known claimants of the dissolution. The notice must:

Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

State that a claim must be in writing and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State the deadline for receipt of a claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the notice is received by the claimant;

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline; and

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability limited partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any general partner or person dissociated as a general partner which is based on Section 79-14-404.

A claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred if the requirements of subsection (b) are met and:

The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

If the claim is timely received but rejected by the partnership:

The partnership causes the claimant to receive a notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the partnership to enforce the claim not later than ninety (90) days after the claimant receives the notice; and

The claimant does not commence the required action not later than ninety (90) days after the claimant receives the notice.

This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 79-14-806, 79-14-807, or 79-14-808, any corresponding claim under Section 79-14-404 or 79-14-607 is also barred, see § 79-14-809.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

§79-14-807.
Other claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

A notice under subsection (a) must:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the dissolved limited partnership’s principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in Hinds County, Mississippi;

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State that a claim against the partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than three (3) years after publication of the notice; and

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability limited partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any general partner or person dissociated as a general partner which is based on Section 79-14-404.

If a dissolved limited partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the partnership not later than three (3) years after the publication date of the notice:

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under Section 79-14-806;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section or Section 79-14-806 may be enforced:

Against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets;

Except as otherwise provided in Section 79-14-808, if assets of the partnership have been distributed after dissolution, against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or of the partnership’s assets distributed to the partner or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person’s total liability for all claims under this paragraph may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution; and

Against any person liable on the claim under Sections 79-14-404 and 79-14-607.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 79-14-806, 79-14-807, or 79-14-808, any corresponding claim under Section 79-14-404 or 79-14-607 is also barred, see § 79-14-809.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

§79-14-808.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved limited partnership that has published a notice under Section 79-14-807 may file an application with the chancery court in the county where the limited partnership’s principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the limited partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution but which, based on the facts known to the limited partnership, are reasonably expected to arise after the date of dissolution. Security is not required for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under Section 79-14-807.

Not later than ten (10) days after the filing of an application under subsection (a), the dissolved limited partnership shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim known to the partnership.

In a proceeding brought under this section, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, must be paid by the dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership that provides security in the amount and form ordered by the court under subsection (a) satisfies the dissolved limited partnership’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution, and such claims may not be enforced against a partner or transferee on account of assets received in liquidation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 79-14-806, 79-14-807, or 79-14-808, any corresponding claim under Section 79-14-404 or 79-14-607 is also barred, see § 79-14-809.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

§79-14-809.
Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under Section 79-14-806, 79-14-807, or 79-14-808, any corresponding claim under Section 79-14-404 or 79-14-607 is also barred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-809 [ Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 90, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided the grounds for an administrative dissolution. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-811.

§79-14-810.
Disposition of assets in winding up; when contributions required.

In winding up its activities and affairs, a limited partnership shall apply its assets, including the contributions required by this section, to discharge the partnership’s obligations to creditors, including partners that are creditors.

After a limited partnership complies with subsection (a), any surplus must be distributed in the following order, subject to any charging order in effect under Section 79-14-703:

To each person owning a transferable interest that reflects contributions made and not previously returned, an amount equal to the value of the unreturned contributions; and

Among persons owning transferable interests in proportion to their respective rights to share in distributions immediately before the dissolution of the partnership.

If a person does not make the additional contribution required by paragraph (2), further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in that paragraph.

If a limited partnership’s assets are insufficient to satisfy all of its obligations under subsection (a), with respect to each unsatisfied obligation incurred when the partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership, the following rules apply:

Each person that was a general partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under Section 79-14-607 shall contribute to the partnership for the purpose of enabling the partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

If a person does not contribute the full amount required under paragraph (1) with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the partnership, the other persons required to contribute by paragraph (1) on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a general partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred.

A person that makes an additional contribution under subsection (c)(2) or (3) may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under subsection (c)(1) or (2) necessitated the additional contribution. A person may not recover under this subsection more than the amount additionally contributed. A person’s liability under this subsection may not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

If a limited partnership does not have sufficient surplus to comply with subsection (b)(1), any surplus must be distributed among the owners of transferable interests in proportion to the value of the respective unreturned contributions.

All distributions made under subsections (b) and (c) must be paid in money.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-810 [ Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 91, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the procedure for an administrative dissolution. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-811.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

§79-14-811.
Administrative dissolution.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under subsection (b) to dissolve a limited partnership administratively if the partnership does not:

Pay any fee, tax, or penalty due to the Secretary of State under this chapter or other law within sixty (60) days after it is due; or

Have a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) consecutive days.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist for administratively dissolving a limited partnership, the Secretary of State shall serve the partnership with notice in a record of the Secretary of State’s determination.

If a limited partnership, not later than sixty (60) days after service of the notice under subsection (b), does not cure or demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Secretary of State the nonexistence of each ground determined by the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the partnership by signing a statement of administrative dissolution that recites the grounds for dissolution and the effective date of dissolution. The Secretary of State shall file the statement and serve a copy on the partnership pursuant to Section 79-35-13, except that the statement of administrative dissolution may be served by first-class mail.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under Sections 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under Section 79-14-812.

The administrative dissolution of a limited partnership does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-811 [ Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 92, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to reinstatement of a limited partnership after an administrative dissolution. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-812.

§79-14-812.
Reinstatement.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved under Section 79-14-811 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement not later than two (2) years after the effective date of dissolution. The application must state:

The name of the partnership at the time of its administrative dissolution and, if needed, a different name that satisfies Section 79-14-114;

The address of the principal office of the partnership and the name and street and mailing addresses of its registered agent;

The effective date of the partnership’s administrative dissolution; and

That the grounds for dissolution did not exist or have been cured.

To be reinstated, a limited partnership must pay all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties that were due to the Mississippi Department of Revenue at the time of the partnership’s administrative dissolution and all fees, taxes, interest, and penalties that would have been due to the Mississippi Department of Revenue while the partnership was administratively dissolved.

If the Secretary of State determines that an application under subsection (a) contains the required information, is satisfied that the information is correct, and determines that all payments required to be made to the Mississippi Department of Revenue by subsection (b) have been made, the Secretary of State shall:

Cancel the statement of administrative dissolution and prepare a statement of reinstatement that states the Secretary of State’s determination and the effective date of reinstatement; and

File the statement of reinstatement and serve a copy on the limited partnership.

When reinstatement under this section is effective, the following rules apply:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution.

The limited partnership resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if the administrative dissolution had not occurred.

The rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the dissolution before the person knew or had notice of the reinstatement are not affected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-812 [ Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 93, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided for an appeal from denial of reinstatement. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-813.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 79-14-802, 79-14-806, 79-14-807, 79-14-808, and 79-14-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 79-14-812, see § 79-14-811.

§79-14-813.
Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a limited partnership’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the Secretary of State shall serve the partnership with a notice in a record that explains the reason or reasons for the denial.

A limited partnership may seek judicial review of denial of reinstatement in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, not later than thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the limited partnership or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.